Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2429
Rules and regulations.

The department, upon the recommendation of the Board of Pharmacy, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Cancer Drug Repository Program Act. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Eligibility criteria and other standards and procedures for participants that accept and distribute or dispense donated cancer drugs;

(2) Necessary forms for administration of the program, including, but not limited to, forms for use by persons or entities that donate, accept, distribute, or dispense cancer drugs under the program. The forms shall include the name of the person to whom the drug was originally prescribed;

(3) The maximum handling fee that may be charged by participants that accept and distribute or dispense donated cancer drugs;

(4)(a) Categories of cancer drugs that the program will accept for dispensing and (b) categories of cancer drugs that the program will not accept for dispensing and the reason that such drugs will not be accepted; and

(5) Maintenance and distribution of the participant registry established in section 71-2430.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 331, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1116, § 2.